Utah, session 2026, HB17.
Section 1. Section 17D-4-205 is amended to read:17D-4-205. Transparency -- Meetings of the board.(1)A public infrastructure district shall file annual reports with the creating entity regarding the public infrastructure district's actions as provided in the governing document.(2)(a)Notwithstanding Subsection 17B-1-310(2), and except as provided in Subsection (2)(b), a board shall hold regular and special meetings at a location within the boundaries of the public infrastructure district.(b)Subsection (2)(a) does not prohibit a board from holding a regular or special meeting at a location outside the boundaries of the public infrastructure district if:(i)(A)there are no locations in the public infrastructure district that are able to accommodate the board and the public that the board reasonably expects will attend the meeting; and(B)the location the board selects is near the public infrastructure district;(ii)it is not practicable to hold the regular or special meeting at a location within the boundaries of the public infrastructure district due to emergency circumstances; or(iii)the location the board selects is within the boundaries of the creating entity.

Section 2:
Section 2.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.